Virginia statutes. Title 36. Housing.
Chapter 7. State Board of Housing.

§§ 36-120 through 36-130.

Repealed by Acts 1977, c. 613.

Cross references.

As to the Department of Housing and Community Development generally, see §

36-131

et seq.

As to the transfer of powers and duties from the Office of Housing to the Department of Housing and Community Development and provisions that certain rules and regulations of the State Board of Housing are to remain in full force and effect until altered, amended or rescinded by the Board of Housing and Community Development, see Editor’s note to §

36-131

.